Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2759.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of veterans' services; Yavapai county; veterans programs The sum of $500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of veterans' services to partner with an educational institution located in Yavapai county for the provision of veterans programs.